Utah statutes.
61-2c-510.   Money accumulated -- Purpose.
(1)  The division may use money accumulated in the fund in excess of the
amount necessary to satisfy claims to:
(a)  investigate violations of this chapter related to fraud; and
(b)  advance education and research in the field of residential mortgage
loans.
(2)  The division may use the excess money described in Subsection (1) only in
a manner consistent with Subsection (1), including for:
(a)  courses sponsored by the division;
(b)  courses offered by the division in conjunction with a university or
college in Utah;
(c)  contracting for a research project for the state in the field of
residential mortgage loans;
(d)  funding the salaries and training expenses of division staff members who
are employed in positions related to the education of mortgage licensees;
(e)  funding the training expenses of division staff members who are employed
in positions conducting investigations of complaints under this chapter; and
(f)  publishing and distributing educational materials to:
(i)  licensees; and
(ii)  applicants for licensure.
